Tennessee, session 114, HB0527.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 40-35-503(b)(2)(A), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting the following:
(2)
(A) The release from custody at the time would depreciate the
seriousness of the crime of which the incarcerated individual stands convicted or
promote disrespect for the law;
SECTION 2. This act takes effect upon becoming a law, the public welfare requiring it.
HB0527
000381
- 1 -